Georgia statutes. TITLE 41 Nuisances
CHAPTER 3 Places Used for Unlawful Sexual and Drug Activities

Cross references.

Penalties for sodomy, prostitution, keeping place of prostitution, and other offenses, T. 16, C. 6.

Use of rooms in roadhouses, public dance halls, and other facilities for immoral purposes, §

43-21-61

.

41-3-1.
“Sexually related charges” defined; establishment, maintenance, or use of building, structure, or place for sexually related activities; evidence of nuisance.

As used in this Code section, the term “sexually related charges” means a violation of Code Section 16-5-46, 16-6-2, 16-6-8, 16-6-9, 16-6-10, 16-6-11, 16-6-12, 16-6-15, or 16-6-16 when:

Returned in an indictment by a grand jury; or

Filed as an accusation by a prosecuting attorney that results in a conviction, a plea of guilty under any first offender statute, a plea of nolo contendere, adjudication in an accountability court, or a dismissal as a result of successful completion of a pretrial diversion program.

Whosoever shall knowingly erect, establish, continue, maintain, use, own, or lease any building, structure, or place for the purposes of sexually related charges shall be guilty of maintaining a nuisance; and the building, structure, or place, and the ground itself in or upon which such sexually related charges occurred or were conducted, permitted, carried on, continued, or shall exist, and the furniture, fixtures, and other contents of such building or structure shall be deemed to be a nuisance and may be enjoined or otherwise abated as provided in this chapter.

The occurrence of either of the following shall be prima-facie evidence of the nuisance and the existence thereof:

A conviction, a plea of guilty under any first offender statute, a plea of nolo contendere, an adjudication in an accountability court, or a dismissal as a result of successful completion of a pretrial diversion program of the owner or operator of any building, structure, or place for any sexually related charges, based on conduct or an act or occurrence in or on the premises of such building, structure, or place; or

When the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the property is located notifies the owner in writing of two or more unrelated incidents of sexually related charges occurring within a 24 month period preceding such notice and, after the receipt of such notice and within 24 months of the first of the incidents resulting in a sexually related charge which is the subject of such notice, another additional unrelated incident occurs which results in a sexually related charge.

Any such sexually related charges which result directly from cooperation between the property owner or his or her agent and a law enforcement agency shall not be considered as evidence of a nuisance under this Code section.

The provisions of this Code section are cumulative of any other remedies and shall not be construed to repeal any other existing remedies for sexually related nuisances.

History.

Ga. L. 1917, p. 177, § 1; Code 1933, § 72-301; Ga. L. 1975, p. 402, § 2; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1025, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 74, § 1-9/SB 158.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, rewrote this Code section, which read: “(a) Whosoever shall knowingly erect, establish, continue, maintain, use, own, or lease any building, structure, or place used for the purpose of lewdness, prostitution, sodomy, the solicitation of sodomy, or masturbation for hire shall be guilty of maintaining a nuisance; and the building, structure, or place, and the ground itself in or upon which such lewdness, prostitution, sodomy, the solicitation of sodomy, or masturbation for hire shall be conducted, permitted, carried on, continued, or shall exist, and the furniture, fixtures, and other contents of such building or structure are also declared to be a nuisance and may be enjoined or otherwise abated as provided in this chapter.

“(b) The conviction of the owner or operator of any building, structure, or place for any of the offenses stated in subsection (a) of this Code section, based on conduct or an act or occurrence in or on the premises of such building, structure, or place, shall be prima-facie evidence of the nuisance and the existence thereof.” See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Cross references.

Provisions regarding public nuisance status of premises used in violation of laws relating to obscenity, §

16-12-82

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 74, § 1-1/SB 158, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Anti-Human Trafficking Protective Response Act.’”

Ga. L. 2019, p. 74, § 3-1/SB 158, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2019, and shall apply to offenses which occur on or after that date. Any offense occurring before July 1, 2019, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense, and any resulting conviction shall be considered a prior conviction for the purpose of imposing a sentence that provides for a different penalty for a subsequent conviction.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 63 (2019).

41-3-1.1.
Substantial drug related activity upon real property; knowledge of owner; remedies cumulative.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Drug related charges” means a violation of Code Section 16-13-30 when:

Returned in an indictment by a grand jury; or

Filed as an accusation by a prosecuting attorney that results in a conviction, a plea of guilty under any first offender statute or conditional discharge pursuant to Code Section 16-13-2, a plea of nolo contendere, adjudication in an accountability court, or a dismissal as a result of successful completion of a pretrial diversion program.

“Substantial drug related activity” means activity resulting in six or more unrelated incidents resulting in drug related charges involving violations occurring within a 24 month period on the same parcel of real property.

Any owner of real property who has actual knowledge that substantial drug related activity is being conducted on such property shall be guilty of maintaining a nuisance, and such real property shall be deemed a nuisance and may be enjoined or otherwise abated as provided in this chapter.

Prima-facie evidence of the nuisance and the existence thereof is established when the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the property is located notifies the owner in writing of three or more unrelated incidents occurring within a 24 month period which result in drug related charges and, after the receipt of such notice and within 24 months of the first of the incidents resulting in a drug related charge which is the subject of such notice, three or more additional unrelated incidents occur which result in drug related charges.

Any such drug related charges which result directly from cooperation between the property owner or his or her agent and a law enforcement agency shall not be considered as evidence of a nuisance under this Code section.

The provisions of this Code section are cumulative of any other remedies and shall not be construed to repeal any other existing remedies for drug related nuisances.

History.

Code 1981, §

41-3-1.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 666, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 467, § 2; Ga. L. 2019, p. 74, § 1-10/SB 158.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, rewrote subsection (a), which read: “(a) As used in this Code section, the term:

“(1) ‘Drug related indictment’ means an indictment by a grand jury for an offense involving violation of Code Section 16-13-30; provided, however, that any such indictments which result directly from cooperation between the property owner and a law enforcement agency shall not be considered a drug related indictment for purposes of this Code section.

“(2) ‘Substantial drug related activity’ means activity resulting in six or more separate incidents resulting in drug related indictments involving violations occurring within a 12 month period on the same parcel of real property.”; in subsection (c), substituted “Prima-facie evidence of the nuisance and the existence thereof is established when the prosecuting attorney” for “The owner of real property shall be deemed to have actual knowledge of substantial drug related activity occurring on a parcel of real property if the district attorney” at the beginning; substituted “unrelated incidents occurring” for “separate incidents” near the middle; twice substituted “24” for “12”; substituted “charges” for “indictments” in the middle and at the end; substituted “charge which is the subject of such notice, three or more additional unrelated incidents” for “indictment which are the subject of such notice, three or more separate incidents” near the end; added subsection (d); and redesignated former subsection (d) as present subsection (e). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 74, § 1-1/SB 158, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Anti-Human Trafficking Protective Response Act.’”

Ga. L. 2019, p. 74, § 3-1/SB 158, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2019, and shall apply to offenses which occur on or after that date. Any offense occurring before July 1, 2019, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense, and any resulting conviction shall be considered a prior conviction for the purpose of imposing a sentence that provides for a different penalty for a subsequent conviction.”

41-3-2.
Action to enjoin nuisance perpetually; temporary restraining order or interlocutory injunction authorized.

Whenever a nuisance is kept, maintained, or exists, as defined in Code Section 41-3-1 or 41-3-1.1, the district attorney, the solicitor-general, city attorney, or county attorney, or any private citizen of the county may maintain an action in the name of the state upon the relation of such attorney or private citizen to enjoin said nuisance perpetually, the person or persons conducting or maintaining the same, and the owner or agent of the building, structure, or place, and the ground itself in or upon which such nuisance exists. In an action to enjoin a nuisance, the court, upon application therefor alleging that the nuisance complained of exists, shall order a temporary restraining order or an interlocutory injunction as provided in Code Section 9-11-65.

History.

Ga. L. 1917, p. 177, § 2; Code 1933, § 72-302; Ga. L. 1996, p. 666, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 467, § 3.

Law reviews.

For note on 1999 amendment to this Code section, see 16 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 211 (1999).

41-3-3.
Dismissal of complaint filed by private citizen; substitution of district attorney or another private citizen for original complainant.

If the complaint is filed by a private citizen, it shall not be dismissed except upon filing of a sworn statement by the complainant and his attorney setting forth the reasons why the action should be dismissed and upon approval of the dismissal by the district attorney in writing or in open court. If the court shall be of the opinion that the action ought not to be dismissed, it may direct the district attorney to maintain the action and, if the action is continued more than one term of court, any private citizen of the county or the district attorney may be substituted for the original complainant and directed to maintain the action.

History.

Ga. L. 1917, p. 177, § 3; Code 1933, § 72-306.

41-3-4.
Notice of hearing upon application for temporary restraining order or interlocutory injunction.

Notice shall be given to the defendant of the hearing of the application for a temporary restraining order or an interlocutory injunction as provided in Code Section 9-11-65.

History.

Ga. L. 1917, p. 177, § 2; Code 1933, § 72-303.

41-3-5.
Procedure for trial of action generally; admissibility of evidence of general reputation of building, structure, or place.

An action to enjoin a nuisance shall be triable as all other civil cases. In such action, evidence of the general reputation of the building, structure, or place shall be admissible for the purpose of proving the existence of such nuisance.

History.

Ga. L. 1917, p. 177, § 3; Code 1933, § 72-305.

41-3-6.
Taxation of cost of action against private citizen bringing action without reasonable ground or cause.

If the action shall be brought by a private citizen and the court shall find that there was no reasonable ground or cause for the action, the cost may be taxed to such citizen.

History.

Ga. L. 1917, p. 177, § 3; Code 1933, § 72-307.

41-3-7.
Order of abatement generally; breaking and entering or using closed building, structure, or place; fees for removal, sale, or closure of property.

If the existence of a nuisance shall be established in an action as provided in this chapter, an order of abatement shall be entered as a part of the judgment in the case, which order shall direct the removal from the building, structure, or place of all fixtures, furniture, and chattels used in conducting the nuisance and shall direct the sale thereof in the manner provided for the sale of chattels under execution; provided, however, that if it shall appear to the judge that the furniture and chattels are owned by others than the occupants of the building, structure, or place, he may order the effectual closing of the building, structure, or place against its use for any purpose for a period of one year, unless sooner released.

If any person shall break and enter or use a building, structure, or place directed to be closed, as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, he shall be punished as for contempt.

For removing and selling the movable property, the sheriff or other duly qualified levying officer of the court shall be entitled to charge and receive the same fees as he would for levying upon and selling like property on execution; and, for closing the premises and keeping them closed, a reasonable sum shall be allowed by the court.

History.

Ga. L. 1917, p. 177, § 5; Code 1933, § 72-309.

41-3-8.
Disposition of proceeds of sale of personal property.

The proceeds of the sale of the personal property, as provided in Code Section 41-3-7, shall be applied in payment of the cost of the action and abatement, and the balance, if any, shall be paid to the defendant.

History.

Ga. L. 1917, p. 177, § 6; Code 1933, § 72-310.

41-3-9.
Suspension of abatement order and release of property; effect of release of property.

If the owner of the building, structure, or place ordered abated shall appear and pay all costs of the proceedings and file a bond with sureties to be approved by the clerk in the full value of the property, to be ascertained by the court, conditioned that he will immediately abate the nuisance and prevent the same from being established or kept within a period of one year thereafter, the court may, if satisfied of the good faith of the owner, order the building, structure, or place closed under the order of abatement to be delivered to said owner and the order of abatement suspended so far as it may relate to said property.

The release of the property under subsection (a) of this Code section shall not release it from any judgment lien, penalty, or liability to which it may be subject by law.

History.

Ga. L. 1917, p. 177, § 7; Code 1933, § 72-311.

41-3-10.
Issuance of permanent injunction; entry and enforcement of judgment; disposition of sums arising from enforcement of judgment.

Whenever a permanent injunction is issued against any person for maintaining a nuisance as described in Code Section 41-3-1 or against any owner of the building, structure, or place knowingly kept or used for the purposes prohibited by this chapter, the judge granting the injunction shall, at the same time, enter judgment against the person, firm, or corporation owning said building, structure, or place in the sum of $300.00; and said judgment shall be a special lien upon the premises complained of and the furniture and fixtures therein and shall as against the property rank from date with all other judgments or liens as provided by law.

The judgment provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section shall issue in the name of the state and be enforced as other judgments in this state. The lien of the judgment upon the property used for the purpose of maintaining the nuisance shall not relieve the person maintaining the nuisance or the owner of the building, structure, or place from any of the other penalties provided by law.

All sums arising from the enforcement of the judgment provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be paid into the treasury of the county in which said judgment is entered and become part of the general funds of said county.

History.

Ga. L. 1917, p. 177, § 8; Code 1933, § 72-312.

41-3-11.
Injunction binding throughout judicial circuit in which issued; violation of provisions of injunction deemed contempt.

When an injunction is granted, it shall be binding on the defendant throughout the judicial circuit in which it is issued; and any violation of the provisions of the injunction shall be a contempt of court.

History.

Ga. L. 1917, p. 177, § 2; Code 1933, § 72-304.

41-3-12.
Contempt proceedings; punishment for contempt of court.

In the event of the violation of any injunction granted under this chapter, the court may summarily try and punish the offender. The proceedings shall be commenced by filing with the clerk of the court an information, under oath, setting out the alleged facts constituting such violation, upon which the court or judge shall cause a warrant to be issued for the arrest of the offender. The trial may be had upon affidavits, or either party may demand the production and oral examination of witnesses.

A party found guilty of violating the provisions of an injunction shall be punished as for contempt in the discretion of the judge.

History.

Ga. L. 1917, p. 177, § 4; Code 1933, § 72-308.

41-3-13.
Abatement of nuisance by state courts and municipal courts of municipalities having population of 15,000 or more.

In addition to the remedies provided for by Code Sections 41-3-2 through 41-3-12, state courts and the municipal courts of municipalities having a population of 15,000 or more according to the United States decennial census of 1970 or any future such census, when the nuisance exists within the corporate limits of such municipalities, shall have jurisdiction to hear and determine the question of the existence of the nuisance defined by Code Section 41-3-1 and, if found to exist, to order its abatement, which order shall be directed to and executed by the sheriff or marshal of any such court or his deputy.

History.

Code 1933, § 72-313, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1025, § 2.